Louisiana, session 2026, HB624.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:416.16(A)(1)(a) through (c), (2), and (4), (B)(2) and (3), (C),
(D)(1), (F), (G)(introductory paragraph), and (J) and 3996(B)(33) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§416.16. School crisis management and response emergency operations plans
A.(1) For the purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the
following meanings:
(a) "Crisis management and response "Emergency operations plan" shall
mean a plan to address school safety and the incidence of a shooting or other
violence at schools, on school buses, and at school-related activities; to respond
effectively to any incidents; and to ensure that every student, teacher, and school
employee has access to a safe, secure, and orderly school that is conducive to
learning. The plan shall also address the management of any other emergency
situation.
(b) "District threat assessment safety and emergency team" shall mean a
team established by each governing authority of public elementary and secondary
schools. The team shall include, at a minimum, the local school superintendent; the
principal of each school; a person with responsibility over the school facilities; a
mental health professional employed by the governing authority, or, if the governing
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 624 ENROLLED
authority has no such employee, a mental health professional selected by the local
school superintendent; any school resource officer employed by the governing
authority; any Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps instructor employed by the
governing authority; and the emergency preparedness and recovery point of contact.
a representative from school facilities, transportation, school nutrition, curriculum,
student services, athletics, logistics, mental health, medical services, technology, and
special education; the emergency response coordinator; the public information
officer; and an elementary school principal, middle school principal, and high school
principal.
(c) "Emergency preparedness and recovery point of contact response
coordinator" shall mean a person selected by the local school superintendent to serve
as a point of contact with local and state officials and the media in the event of an
emergency. who oversees the development of the emergency operations plan and any
associated training.
* * *
(2)(a) A school crisis management and response emergency operations plan
shall be prepared by each public school principal jointly with local law enforcement,
fire, public safety, and emergency preparedness officials. The plan shall seek to
utilize resources and information available through the Louisiana Commission on
School and Nonprofit Security, R.S. 29:726.5 et seq.
(b) In preparing or revising the plan, the principal shall consult with the
district threat assessment safety and emergency team. The principal and the threat
assessment team shall determine whether to consider input from students enrolled
in the school and their parents, teachers at the school, other school employees, and
community leaders.
* * *
(4) The plan shall provide for an all-hazards approach response plan for
emergency events including any event with a hostage, an active shooter, assailant,
or a building lockdown.
* * *
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 624 ENROLLED
B.
* * *
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, when
conducting the annual review of the crisis management and response emergency
operations plan for a high school, the school principal shall seek and consider input
from the students enrolled in the school who shall be represented by either the
president of the senior class or the president of the student council and at least one
other responsible student selected by the principal.
(3) The local school superintendent shall make an annual report to the public
school governing authority on the status of the plan of each school under the
governing authority's jurisdiction and shall submit a copy of the report to the state
Department of Education and the Center for Safe Schools provided for in R.S.
29:276.5.1. Each public school shall complete an annual school safety questionnaire
developed and distributed by the Louisiana Center for Safe Schools in partnership
with the state Department of Education. The questionnaire shall request information
related to the school's compliance with plan requirements, completion of required
drills, and identified needs related to emergency response and preparedness. Upon
completion of the school-level questionnaire by each school, each public school
governing authority shall complete a district-level questionnaire. Both the
school-level and district-level questionnaires shall be submitted to the department
and the center at a date and frequency to be determined.
C.(1) For purposes of planning, training, and evaluation, emergency
preparedness activities conducted by a school shall be classified as either
discussion-based exercises or operations-based exercises, as follows:
(a) Discussion-based exercises are designed to increase understanding of
emergency plans, roles, and decisionmaking processes without requiring physical
response activities or simulated movement of students or staff. These exercises may
include:
(i) Orientation or seminars, which introduce emergency plans, roles,
responsibilities, and expectations.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 624 ENROLLED
(ii) Workshops, which are used to develop, review, or refine emergency
plans, procedures, or interagency agreements.
(iii) Tabletop exercises, in which participants discuss response actions,
coordination, and decisionmaking during a simulated emergency scenario.
(b) Operations-based exercises are designed to test and validate emergency
response procedures through action-based activities. These exercises may include:
(i) Drills, which test a single emergency function, such as evacuation,
lockdown, or shelter-in-place but which shall not involve the use of blanks,
simulated weapons, or the active participation of community emergency response
partners reenacting response actions.
(ii) Functional exercises, which test command, control, coordination, and
communication during a simulated incident and may involve limited participation
by community partners reenacting their specific response roles, without full
deployment of personnel or equipment.
(iii) Full-scale exercises, which involve a simulated emergency scenario
using personnel, equipment, and the coordinated participation of all community
partners that would be expected to respond to that specific incident.
(1) (2) Within the first thirty instructional days of each school year, each
public school principal shall conduct a safety drill to rehearse the components of the
plan, including an active shooter assailant scenario. In addition, each school year,
each principal shall conduct at least one additional drill during high traffic or
transition points in the school day. Not later than seven days after each drill, the
principal shall submit a written report summarizing the details of the drill to the local
school superintendent. The superintendent or emergency response coordinator shall
comment provide feedback on the drill to the principal, who shall consider the
comments feedback in revising the plan.
(2) (3) Each public school principal shall notify all teachers and other school
employees regarding revisions made to the plan.
D. Each plan shall provide that:
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 624 ENROLLED
(1) The door of each classroom and other instructional space shall be locked
and secured to prevent entry into the room when it is occupied by students, except
between class periods when students are moving between classrooms and other
instructional spaces. If a classroom or other instructional space is left unlocked or
open for any other reason, the door shall be actively staffed by an authorized person
standing or seated at the door. Classroom doors with locks shall be in compliance
with legislatively enacted code requirements and all fire safety standards
promulgated by the office of state fire marshal. Each plan shall provide that a locked
door shall not obstruct egress. code enforcement and building safety of the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections and shall remain locked during
instructional time. Each plan shall provide that a locked door shall not obstruct
egress. For purposes of this Paragraph, "locked and secured" means that no devices
or obstacles are present which would prevent the door locking mechanism from
being fully engaged as originally designed or intended.
* * *
F. Each school year, each public school principal shall be responsible for
providing in-service training, a workshop, which may be incorporated into a meeting
or training session held for another purpose, for all teachers and school employees
pertaining to the plan and shall involve local law enforcement, fire, public safety, and
emergency preparedness officials in the preparation and presentation of the training.
The training shall include an active shooter assailant exercise. The training shall be
reported to the local school superintendent and the state Department of Education.
G. Each public school principal shall keep a copy of the approved plan in his
office. The plan shall be accessible to the state Department of Education and
Louisiana Center for Safe Schools upon request. and The principal shall provide a
copy to the following individuals, each of whom shall be responsible for keeping in
his respective office a copy of the plan that is readily accessible in the event of a
school shooting or other violent incident or emergency situation:
* * *
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 624 ENROLLED
J. In accordance with R.S. 44:3.1, school crisis management and response
emergency operations plans shall not be subject to the Public Records Law.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(33) School crisis management and response emergency operations plans,
R.S. 17:416.16.
* * *
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is directed to alphabetize and renumber
the terms defined in R.S. 17:416.16(A)(1) as amended and reenacted by the provisions of
Section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. 17:416.16(G)(4) and (5) are hereby repealed in their entirety.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.